Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5262.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-42-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-42 entitled "Threats and
Extortion" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-42-4. Threats to public officials.
(a) Whoever knowingly and willfully delivers or conveys, directly or indirectly, a verbal
or written threat to take the life of, or to inflict bodily harm upon, a public official or a member of
his or her immediate family because of the performance or nonperformance of some public duty;
because of hostility of the person making the threat toward the status or position of the public
official; or because of some other factor related to the official’s public existence, shall be guilty of
a felony and shall be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(b) For purposes of this section:
(1) “Public official” means a person who is elected or appointed to office in accordance
with the constitution, a statute, or a city or town charter, or who is a judge, magistrate, assistant
attorney general, special assistant attorney general, or law enforcement officer, or in the case of
schools, a school superintendent, central office official, school principal, and all other school
employees, or in the case of an elective office, any person who has filed the required documents
for nomination or election to that office or who is appointed by the governor to serve as the director
or his or her designee of a state department that is established and the qualifications and duties of
which are prescribed by statute to discharge a public duty for the state of Rhode Island;

(2) “Immediate family” means a public official’s spouse, child, or children.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000926
========
LC000926 - Page 2 of 3